Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB654.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in[For the purpose of] this section:
(a) "Minority" means American Indian; Alaskan native; African-American;
Hispanic, including persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, and Central or
South American origin; Pacific islander; or other ethnic group
underrepresented in the school;
(b) "School" means an elementary or secondary educational institution that is
under the administrative control of a principal and is not a program or part of
another school. The term "school" does not include district-operated schools
that are:
1. Exclusively vocational-technical, special education, or preschool
programs;
2. Instructional programs operated in institutions or schools outside of the
district; or
3. Alternative schools designed to provide services to at-risk populations
with unique needs;
(c) "Teacher" means any person for whom certification is required as a basis of
employment in the public schools of the state, with the exception of principals
and assistant principals; and
(d) "Parent" means:
1. A parent, stepparent, or foster parent of a student; or
2. A person who has legal custody of a student pursuant to a court order
and with whom the student resides.
(2) Each local board of education shall adopt a policy for implementing school-based
decision making in the district which shall include but not be limited to a
Page 1 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
description of how the district's policies, including those developed pursuant to
KRS 160.340, have been amended to allow the professional staff members of a
school to be involved in the decision-making process as they work to meet
educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and 158.6451. The policy may
include a requirement that each school council make an annual report at a public
meeting of the local board describing the school's progress in meeting the
educational goals set forth in KRS 158.6451 and district goals established by the
local board. The policy shall also address and comply with the following:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)2. of this subsection, each participating
school shall form a school council composed of two (2) parents, three (3)
teachers, and the principal or administrator. The membership of the council
may be increased, but it may only be increased proportionately. A parent
representative on the council shall not be an employee or a relative of an
employee of the school in which that parent serves, nor shall the parent
representative be an employee or a relative of an employee in the district
administrative offices. A parent representative shall not be a local board
member or a board member's spouse. None of the members shall have a
conflict of interest pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A, except the salary paid to
district employees;
(b) 1. The teacher representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms by a
majority of the teachers. A teacher elected to a school council shall not
be involuntarily transferred during the teacher representative's term of
office. The parent representatives shall be elected for one (1) year terms.
The parent members shall be elected by the parents of students
preregistered to attend the school during the term of office in an election
conducted by the parent and teacher organization of the school or, if
none exists, the largest organization of parents formed for this purpose.
Page 2 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
Council elections may allow voting to occur over multiple days and via
electronic means. A school council, once elected, may adopt a policy
setting different terms of office for parent and teacher members
subsequently elected. The principal shall be the chair of the school
council.
2. School councils in schools having eight percent (8%) or more minority
students enrolled, as determined by the enrollment on the preceding
October 1, shall have at least one (1) minority member. If the council
formed under paragraph (a) of this subsection does not have a minority
member, the principal, in a timely manner, shall be responsible for
carrying out the following:
a. Organizing a special election to elect an additional member. The
principal shall call for nominations and shall notify the parents of
the students of the date, time, and location of the election to elect a
minority parent to the council by ballot; and
b. Allowing the teachers in the building to select one (1) minority
teacher to serve as a teacher member on the council. If there are no
minority teachers who are members of the faculty, an additional
teacher member shall be elected by a majority of all teachers.
Term limitations shall not apply for a minority teacher member
who is the only minority on faculty;
(c) 1. The school council shall have the responsibility to set school policy that
shall be consistent with district board policy and which shall provide an
environment to enhance the students' achievement and help the school
meet the goals established by KRS 158.645 and 158.6451 and goals for
the district established by the board. The principal shall be the primary
administrator and the instructional leader of the school, and with the
Page 3 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
assistance of the total school staff shall administer the policies
established by the school council and the local board.
2. If a school council establishes committees, it shall adopt a policy to
facilitate the participation of interested persons, including, but not
limited to, classified employees and parents. The policy shall include the
number of committees, their jurisdiction, composition, and the process
for membership selection;
(d) The school council and each of its committees shall determine the frequency
of and agenda for their meetings. Matters relating to formation of school
councils that are not provided for by this section shall be addressed by local
board policy;
(e) The meetings of the school council shall be open to the public and all
interested persons may attend. However, the exceptions to open meetings
provided in KRS 61.810 shall apply;
(f) After receiving notification of the funds available for the school from the local
board, the school council shall determine, within the parameters of the total
available funds, the number of persons to be employed in each job
classification at the school. The council may make personnel decisions on
vacancies occurring after the school council is formed but shall not have the
authority to recommend transfers or dismissals;
(g) The local superintendent shall determine which curriculum, textbooks,
instructional materials, and student support services shall be provided in the
school after consulting with the local board of education, the school principal,
and the school council and after a reasonable review and response period for
stakeholders in accordance with local board of education policy. Subject to
available resources, the local board shall allocate an appropriation to each
school that is adequate to meet the school's needs related to instructional
Page 4 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
materials and school-based student support services, as determined by the
school principal after consultation with the school council. The school council
shall consult with the school media librarian on the maintenance of the school
library media center, including the purchase of instructional materials,
information technology, and equipment;
(h) Personnel decisions at the school level shall be as follows:
1. From a list of qualified applicants submitted by the local superintendent,
the principal at the participating school shall select personnel to fill
vacancies, after consultation with the school council, consistent with
paragraph (i)11. of this subsection. The superintendent shall provide
additional applicants to the principal upon request when qualified
applicants are available. The superintendent may forward to the school
principal the names of qualified applicants who have pending
certification from the Education Professional Standards Board based on
recent completion of preparation requirements, out-of-state preparation,
or alternative routes to certification pursuant to KRS 161.028 and
161.048. Requests for transfer shall conform to any employer-employee
bargained contract which is in effect;
2. If the vacancy to be filled is the position of principal:
a. The superintendent shall fill the vacancy after consultation with
the school council consistent with paragraph (i)11. of this
subsection;
b. Prior to consultation with the school council, each member shall
sign a nondisclosure agreement forbidding the disclosure of
information shared and discussions held during consultation;
c. A person who believes a violation of the nondisclosure agreement
referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph has occurred may
Page 5 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
file a written complaint with the Kentucky Board of Education;
and
d. A school council member found to have violated the nondisclosure
agreement referred to in subdivision b. of this subparagraph may
be subject to removal from the school council by the Kentucky
Board of Education under subsection (9)(e) of this section;
3. Notwithstanding subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if the vacancy to be
filled is the position of principal in a county school district in a county
with a consolidated local government adopted under KRS Chapter 67C,
then:
a. The outgoing principal shall not serve on the council during the
principal selection process. The superintendent or the
superintendent's designee shall serve as the chair of the council for
the purpose of the hiring process and shall have voting rights
during the selection process;
b. The council shall have access to the applications of all persons
certified for the position. The principal shall be elected on a
majority vote of the membership of the council. The school
council shall receive training in recruitment and interviewing
techniques prior to carrying out the process of selecting a
principal. The council shall select the trainer to deliver the
training; and
c. Notwithstanding the requirement that a principal be elected by a
majority vote of the council, the selection of a principal shall be
subject to approval by the superintendent. If the superintendent
does not approve the principal selected by the council, then the
superintendent may select the principal;
Page 6 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
4. No principal who has been previously removed from a position in the
district for cause may be considered for appointment as principal in that
district;
5. Personnel decisions made at the school level under the authority of
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be binding on the superintendent
who completes the hiring process;
6. Applicants subsequently employed shall provide evidence that they are
certified prior to assuming the duties of a position in accordance with
KRS 161.020; and
7. Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, if the applicant is
the spouse of the superintendent and the applicant meets the service
requirements of KRS 160.380(3)(a), the applicant shall only be
employed upon the recommendation of the principal and the approval of
a majority vote of the school council;
(i) The school council shall adopt a policy that shall be consistent with local
board policy and shall be implemented by the principal in the following
additional areas:
1. Curriculum responsibilities under KRS 158.6453(19);
2. Assignment of all instructional and noninstructional staff time;
3. Assignment of students to classes and programs within the school;
4. Determination of the schedule of the school day and week, subject
to the beginning and ending times of the school day and school
calendar year as established by the local board;
5. Determination of use of school space during the school day related
to improving classroom teaching and learning;
6. Planning and resolution of issues regarding instructional practices;
7. Selection and implementation of discipline and classroom
Page 7 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
management techniques as a part of a comprehensive school safety
plan, including responsibilities of the student, parent, teacher,
counselor, and principal;
8. Selection of extracurricular programs and determination of
policies relating to student participation based on academic
qualifications and attendance requirements, program evaluation,
and supervision;
9. Adoption of an emergency plan as required in KRS 158.162;
10. Procedures, consistent with local school board policy, for
determining alignment with state standards, technology utilization,
and program appraisal; and
11. Procedures to assist the council with consultation in the selection
of the principal by the superintendent, and the selection of
personnel by the principal, including but not limited to meetings,
timelines, interviews, review of written applications, and review of
references. Procedures shall address situations in which members
of the council are not available for consultation; and
(j) Each school council shall annually review data as shown on state and local
student assessments required under KRS 158.6453. The data shall include but
not be limited to information on performance levels of all students tested, and
information on the performance of students disaggregated by race, gender,
disability, and participation in the federal free and reduced price lunch
program. After completing the review of data, each school council, with the
involvement of parents, faculty, and staff, shall develop and adopt a plan to
ensure that each student makes progress toward meeting the goals set forth in
KRS 158.645 and 158.6451(1)(b) by April 1 of each year and submit the plan
to the superintendent and local board of education for review as described in
Page 8 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
KRS 160.340. The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide each
school council the data needed to complete the review required by this
paragraph no later than October 1 of each year. If a school does not have a
council, the review shall be completed by the principal with the involvement
of parents, faculty, and staff.
(3) The policies adopted by the local board to implement school-based decision making
shall also address the following:
(a) School budget and administration, including: discretionary funds; activity and
other school funds; funds for maintenance, supplies, and equipment; and
procedures for authorizing reimbursement for training and other expenses;
(b) Assessment of individual student progress, including testing and reporting of
student progress to students, parents, the school district, the community, and
the state;
(c) School improvement plans, including the form and function of strategic
planning and its relationship to district planning, as well as the school safety
plan and requests for funding from the Center for School Safety under KRS
158.446;
(d) Professional development plans developed pursuant to KRS 156.095;
(e) Parent, citizen, and community participation including the relationship of the
council with other groups;
(f) Cooperation and collaboration within the district, with other districts, and with
other public and private agencies;
(g) Requirements for waiver of district policies;
(h) Requirements for record keeping by the school council; and
(i) A process for appealing a decision made by a school council.
(4) In addition to the authority granted to the school council in this section, the local
board may grant to the school council any other authority permitted by law. The
Page 9 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
board shall make available liability insurance coverage for the protection of all
members of the school council from liability arising in the course of pursuing their
duties as members of the council.
(5) All schools shall implement school-based decision making in accordance with this
section and with the policy adopted by the local board pursuant to this section.
Upon favorable vote of a majority of the faculty at the school and a majority of at
least twenty-five (25) voting parents of students enrolled in the school, a school
meeting its goal as determined by the Department of Education pursuant to KRS
158.6455 may apply to the Kentucky Board of Education for exemption from the
requirement to implement school-based decision making, and the state board shall
grant the exemption. The voting by the parents on the matter of exemption from
implementing school-based decision making shall be in an election conducted by
the parent and teacher organization of the school or, if none exists, the largest
organization of parents formed for this purpose. Notwithstanding the provisions of
this section, a local school district shall not be required to implement school-based
decision making if the local school district contains only one (1) school.
(6) The Department of Education shall provide professional development activities to
assist schools in implementing school-based decision making. School council
members elected for the first time shall complete a minimum of six (6) clock hours
of training in the process of school-based decision making, no later than thirty (30)
days after the beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve.
School council members who have served on a school council at least one (1) year
shall complete a minimum of three (3) clock hours of training in the process of
school-based decision making no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the
beginning of the service year for which they are elected to serve. Experienced
members may participate in the training for new members to fulfill their training
requirement. School council training required under this subsection shall be
Page 10 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
conducted by trainers endorsed by the Department of Education. By November 1 of
each year, the principal through the local superintendent shall forward to the
Department of Education the names and addresses of each council member and
verify that the required training has been completed. School council members
elected to fill a vacancy shall complete the applicable training within thirty (30)
days of their election.
(7) A school that chooses to have school-based decision making but would like to be
exempt from the administrative structure set forth by this section may develop a
model for implementing school-based decision making, including but not limited to
a description of the membership, organization, duties, and responsibilities of a
school council. The school shall submit the model through the local board of
education to the commissioner of education and the Kentucky Board of Education,
which shall have final authority for approval. The application for approval of the
model shall show evidence that it has been developed by representatives of the
parents, students, certified personnel, and the administrators of the school and that
two-thirds (2/3) of the faculty have agreed to the model.
(8) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the commissioner of
education, shall adopt by administrative regulation a formula by which school
district funds shall be allocated to each school council. Included in the school
council formula shall be an allocation for professional development that is at least
sixty-five percent (65%) of the district's per pupil state allocation for professional
development for each student in average daily attendance in the school. The school
council shall plan professional development in compliance with requirements
specified in KRS 156.095, except as provided in KRS 158.649. School councils of
small schools shall be encouraged to work with other school councils to maximize
professional development opportunities.
(9) (a) No board member, superintendent of schools, district employee, or member of
Page 11 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
a school council shall intentionally engage in a pattern of practice which is
detrimental to the successful implementation of or circumvents the intent of
school-based decision making to allow the professional staff members of a
school and parents to be involved in the decision making process in working
toward meeting the educational goals established in KRS 158.645 and
158.6451 or to make decisions in areas of policy assigned to a school council
pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (2) of this section.
(b) An affected party who believes a violation of this subsection has occurred
may file a written complaint with the Office of Education Accountability. The
office shall investigate the complaint and resolve the conflict, if possible, or
forward the matter to the Kentucky Board of Education.
(c) The Kentucky Board of Education shall conduct a hearing in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13B for complaints referred by the Office of Education
Accountability.
(d) If the state board determines a violation has occurred, the party shall be
subject to reprimand. A second violation of this subsection may be grounds
for removing a superintendent or a member of a school council from office or
grounds for dismissal of an employee for misconduct in office or willful
neglect of duty.
(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of this subsection and KRS 7.410(2)(c), if the
state board determines a violation of the nondisclosure agreement required by
subsection (2)(h)2.b. of this section by a school council member has occurred,
the state board shall remove the member from the school council, and the
member shall be permanently prohibited from serving on any school council
in the district.
(10) Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (9) of this section, a school's right to establish or
maintain a school-based decision making council and the powers, duties, and
Page 12 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
authority granted to a school council may be rescinded or the school council's role
may be advisory if the commissioner of education or the Kentucky Board of
Education takes action under KRS 160.346.
(11) Each school council of a school containing grades K-5 or any combination thereof,
or if there is no school council, the principal, shall develop and implement a
wellness policy that includes moderate to vigorous physical activity each day and
encourages healthy choices among students. The policy may permit physical
activity to be considered part of the instructional day, not to exceed thirty (30)
minutes per day, or one hundred and fifty (150) minutes per week. Each school
council, or if there is no school council, the principal, shall adopt an assessment tool
to determine each child's level of physical activity on an annual basis. The council
or principal may utilize an existing assessment program. The Kentucky Department
of Education shall make available a list of available resources to carry out the
provisions of this subsection.[ The department shall report to the Legislative
Research Commission no later than November 1 of each year on how the schools
are providing physical activity under this subsection and on the types of physical
activity being provided.] The policy developed by the school council or principal
shall comply with provisions required by federal law, state law, or local board
policy.
(12) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the Kentucky Board of Education or
Kentucky Department of Education shall not require a school to complete any
component of a comprehensive school improvement plan that does not expressly
apply to that school by federal law or state statute. When requiring a school to
complete a component of a comprehensive school improvement plan, the
department shall provide the school a specific citation to the federal law or state
statute requiring that school to complete the component.
Section 2. KRS 160.380 is amended to read as follows:
Page 13 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Administrative finding of child abuse or neglect" means a substantiated
finding of child abuse or neglect issued by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services that is:
1. Not appealed through an administrative hearing conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
2. Upheld at an administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B and not appealed to a Circuit Court; or
3. Upheld by a Circuit Court in an appeal of the results of an
administrative hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B;
(b) "Alternative education program" means a program that exists to meet the
needs of students that cannot be addressed in a traditional classroom setting
but through the assignment of students to alternative classrooms, centers, or
campuses that are designed to remediate academic performance, improve
behavior, or provide an enhanced learning experience. Alternative education
programs do not include career or technical centers or departments;
(c) "Clear CA/N check" means a letter from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services indicating that there are no administrative findings of child abuse or
neglect relating to a specific individual;
(d) "Relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband, wife, son and
daughter; and
(e) "Vacancy" means any certified position opening created by the resignation,
dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or death of a certified staff
member of a local school district, or a new position created in a local school
district for which certification is required. However, if an employer-employee
bargained contract contains procedures for filling certified position openings
created by the resignation, dismissal, nonrenewal of contract, transfer, or
Page 14 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
death of a certified staff member, or creation of a new position for which
certification is required, a vacancy shall not exist, unless certified positions
remain open after compliance with those procedures.
(2) Except as provided in KRS 160.346, the school district personnel actions identified
in this section shall be carried out as follows:
(a) All appointments, promotions, and transfers of principals, supervisors,
teachers, and other public school employees shall be made only by the
superintendent of schools, who shall notify the board of the action taken. All
employees of the local district shall have the qualifications prescribed by law
and by the administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education and
of the employing board. Supervisors, principals, teachers, and other
employees may be appointed by the superintendent for any school year at any
time after February 1 preceding the beginning of the school year. No
superintendent of schools shall appoint or transfer himself or herself to
another position within the school district;
(b) When a vacancy occurs in a local school district, the superintendent shall
submit the job posting to the statewide job posting system described in KRS
160.152 fifteen (15) days before the position shall be filled. The local school
district shall post position openings in the local board office for public
viewing; and
(c) When a vacancy needs to be filled in less than fifteen (15) days' time to
prevent disruption of necessary instructional or support services of the school
district, the superintendent may seek a waiver from the chief state school
officer outside of the process established in KRS 156.161. If the waiver is
approved, the appointment shall not be made until the person recommended
for the position has been approved by the chief state school officer. The chief
state school officer shall respond to a district's request for waiver or for
Page 15 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
approval of an appointment within two (2) working days[; and
(d) When a vacancy occurs in a local district, the superintendent shall conduct a
search to locate minority teachers to be considered for the position. The
superintendent shall, pursuant to administrative regulations of the Kentucky
Board of Education, report annually the district's recruitment process and the
activities used to increase the percentage of minority teachers in the district].
(3) Restrictions on employment of relatives shall be as follows:
(a) No relative of a superintendent of schools shall be an employee of the school
district. However, this shall not apply to a relative who is a classified or
certified employee of the school district for at least thirty-six (36) months
prior to the superintendent assuming office and who is qualified for the
position the employee holds. A superintendent's spouse who has previously
been employed in a school system may be an employee of the school district.
A superintendent's spouse who is employed under this provision shall not hold
a position in which the spouse supervises certified or classified employees. A
superintendent's spouse may supervise teacher aides and student teachers.
However, the superintendent shall not promote a relative who continues
employment under an exception of this subsection;
(b) No superintendent shall employ a relative of a school board member of the
district;
(c) No principal's relative shall be employed in the principal's school; and
(d) A relative that is ineligible for employment under paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of
this subsection may be employed as a substitute for a certified or classified
employee if the relative is not:
1. A regular full-time or part-time employee of the district;
2. Accruing continuing contract status or any other right to continuous
employment;
Page 16 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
3. Receiving fringe benefits other than those provided other substitutes; or
4. Receiving preference in employment or assignment over other
substitutes.
(4) No superintendent shall assign a certified or classified staff person to an alternative
education program as part of any disciplinary action taken pursuant to KRS 161.011
or 161.790 as part of a corrective action plan established pursuant to the local
district evaluation plan.
(5) No superintendent shall employ in any position in the district any person who:
(a) Has been convicted of an offense that would classify a person as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) Has been convicted of a sex crime as defined by KRS 17.500 or a
misdemeanor offense under KRS Chapter 510;
(c) Is required to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.500 to 17.580; or
(d) Has an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect in records maintained
by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(6) Requirements for background checks shall be as follows:
(a) A superintendent shall require the following individuals to submit to a
national and state criminal background check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual:
1. Each new certified or classified hire;
2. A nonfaculty coach or nonfaculty assistant as defined under KRS
161.185;
3. A student teacher;
4. A school-based decision making council parent member; and
5. Any adult who is permitted access to school grounds on a regularly
scheduled and continuing basis pursuant to a written agreement for the
Page 17 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
purpose of providing services directly to a student or students as part of
a school-sponsored program or activity;
(b) 1. The requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:
a. Classified and certified individuals employed by the school district
prior to June 27, 2019;
b. Certified individuals who were employed in another certified
position in a Kentucky school district within six (6) months of the
date of hire and who had previously submitted to a national and
state criminal background check and who have a clear CA/N check
for the previous employment; or
c. Student teachers who have submitted to and provide a copy of a
national and state criminal background check by the Department
of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation
through an accredited teacher education institution in which the
student teacher is enrolled and who have a clear CA/N check.
2. The Education Professional Standards Board may promulgate
administrative regulations to impose additional qualifications to meet
the requirements of Pub. L. No. 92-544;
(c) A parent member may serve prior to the receipt of the criminal history
background check and CA/N letter required by paragraph (a) of this
subsection but shall be removed from the council on receipt by the school
district of a report documenting a record of abuse or neglect, or a sex crime or
criminal offense against a victim who is a minor as defined in KRS 17.500, or
as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, and no further procedures
shall be required;
(d) A superintendent may require a volunteer or a visitor to submit to a national
and state criminal history background check by the Department of Kentucky
Page 18 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation and have a clear CA/N
check, provided by the individual; and
(e) The superintendent of a school district operating under an alternative
transportation plan approved by the Kentucky Department of Education in
accordance with KRS 156.153(3) shall require the driver of any non-school
bus passenger vehicle authorized to transport students to and from school
pursuant to the alternative transportation plan who does not have a valid
commercial driver's license issued in accordance with KRS Chapter 281A
with an "S" endorsement to:
1. Submit to a national and state criminal background check by the
Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of
Investigation at least once every three (3) years and a criminal records
check conducted in accordance with KRS 27A.090 in all other years;
2. Submit to drug testing consistent with the requirements of 49 C.F.R. pt.
40;
3. Provide a biannual driving history record check performed by the
Transportation Cabinet;
4. Provide an annual clear CA/N check;
5. Immediately notify the superintendent of any conviction for a violation
under KRS Chapter 189 for which penalty points are assessed; and
6. Immediately notify the superintendent of any citation or arrest for a
violation of any provision of KRS Chapter 189A. The superintendent
shall inform the Kentucky Department of Education of the notification.
(7) (a) If a certified or classified position remains unfilled after July 31 or if a
vacancy occurs during a school term, a superintendent may employ an
individual, who will have supervisory or disciplinary authority over minors,
on probationary status pending receipt of the criminal history background
Page 19 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
check and a clear CA/N check, provided by the individual. Application for the
criminal record and a request for a clear CA/N check of a probationary
employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment
begins.
(b) Employment shall be contingent on the receipt of the criminal history
background check documenting that the probationary employee has no record
of a sex crime nor as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and receipt
of a letter, provided by the individual, from the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services stating the employee is clear to hire based on no administrative
findings of child abuse or neglect found through a background check of child
abuse and neglect records maintained by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 161.720 to 161.800 or any other statute to the contrary,
probationary employment under this section shall terminate on receipt by the
school district of a criminal history background check documenting a record
of a sex crime or as a violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165 and no
further procedures shall be required.
(8) The provisions of KRS 161.790 shall apply to terminate employment of a certified
employee on the basis of a criminal record other than a record of a sex crime or as a
violent offender as defined in KRS 17.165, or on the basis of a CA/N check
showing an administrative finding of child abuse or neglect.
(9) (a) All fingerprints requested under this section shall be on an applicant
fingerprint card provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The
fingerprint cards shall be forwarded to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
from the Department of Kentucky State Police after a state criminal
background check is conducted. The results of the state and federal criminal
background check shall be sent to the hiring superintendent. Any fee charged
Page 20 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and
conducting the search.
(b) Each application form, provided by the employer to an applicant for a
certified or classified position, shall conspicuously state the following: "FOR
THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL
AND STATE CRIMINAL HISTORY BACKGROUND CHECK AND A
LETTER, PROVIDED BY THE INDIVIDUAL, FROM THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES STATING THE APPLICANT
HAS NO ADMINISTRATIVE FINDINGS OF CHILD ABUSE OR
NEGLECT FOUND THROUGH A BACKGROUND CHECK OF CHILD
ABUSE AND NEGLECT RECORDS MAINTAINED BY THE CABINET
FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES."
(c) Each application form for a district position shall require the applicant to:
1. Identify the states in which he or she has maintained residency,
including the dates of residency; and
2. Provide picture identification.
(10) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
when an employee of the school district is charged with any offense which is
classified as a felony, the superintendent may transfer the employee to a second
position until such time as the employee is found not guilty, the charges are
dismissed, the employee is terminated, or the superintendent determines that further
personnel action is not required. The employee shall continue to be paid at the same
rate of pay he or she received prior to the transfer. If an employee is charged with
an offense outside of the Commonwealth, this provision may also be applied if the
charge would have been treated as a felony if committed within the
Page 21 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
Commonwealth. Transfers shall be made to prevent disruption of the educational
process and district operations and in the interest of students and staff and shall not
be construed as evidence of misconduct.
(11) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each certified and classified employee of
the school district shall notify the superintendent if he or she has been found by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services to have abused or neglected a child, and if
he or she has waived the right to appeal a substantiated finding of child abuse or
neglect or if the substantiated incident was upheld upon appeal. Any failure to
report this finding shall result in the certified or classified employee being subject
to dismissal or termination.
(12) The form for requesting a CA/N check shall be made available on the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services website.
Section 3. KRS 158.1413 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, each school district shall implement
essential workplace ethics programs that promote characteristics that are critical to
success in the workplace. Each student in elementary, middle, and high school shall
receive essential workplace ethics instruction that shall include but not be limited
to:
(a) Adaptability, including an openness to learning and problem solving, an
ability to embrace new ways of doing things, and a capability for critical
thinking;
(b) Diligence, including seeing a task through to completion;
(c) Initiative, including taking appropriate action when needed without waiting
for direct instruction;
(d) Knowledge, including exhibiting an understanding of work-related
information, the ability to apply that understanding to a job, and effectively
explain the concepts to colleagues in reading, writing, mathematics, science,
Page 22 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
and technology as required by the job;
(e) Reliability, including showing up on time, wearing appropriate attire, self-
control, motivation, and ethical behavior;
(f) Remaining drug-free; and
(g) Working well with others, including effective communication skills, respect
for different points of view and diversity of coworkers, the ability to
cooperate and collaborate, enthusiasm, and the ability to provide appropriate
leadership to or support for colleagues.
(2) (a) A school district shall use the essential workplace ethics characteristics listed
in subsection (1) of this section when creating a program or when choosing an
existing program.
(b) Each school district's local workforce investment board, in conjunction with
local economic development organizations from its state regional sector, and
other economic, workforce, or industry organizations the workforce
investment board deems necessary, shall recommend to the school district
best practices which may be used by schools to implement an essential
workplace ethics program.
(3) By January 1, 2019, and every two (2) years thereafter, each local school board
shall collaborate with the local workforce investment board, in conjunction with
local economic development organizations from its state regional sector, and other
economic, workforce, or industry organizations the workforce investment board
deems necessary, to establish essential workplace ethics indicators for middle and
high school students that are aligned with the essential workplace ethics
characteristics listed in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Each local school board shall design and adopt a diploma seal, certificate, card, or
other identifiable symbol to award students deemed as having minimally
demonstrated attainment of the local board's essential workplace ethics indicators[.
Page 23 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
(5) By September 1, 2019, and every two (2) years thereafter, the superintendent of
each school district shall provide to the commissioner of education and the
Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board a report, in a format specified by the
commissioner, describing the school district's essential workplace ethics programs
and how they are being implemented at each school. A summary report compiled
by the commissioner that includes information from all local school district reports
shall be provided to the Kentucky Board of Education, the Interim Joint Committee
on Education, the Kentucky Workforce Innovation Board and each Kentucky
superintendent and principal in order to foster program improvement and the
sharing of best practices].
Section 4. KRS 158.647 (Effective until January 1, 2027) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) A permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known
as the Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee is hereby
created. The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as
follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate;
one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the
minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader in the House of Representatives. Members of the subcommittee shall serve
for terms of two (2) years, and the members appointed from each chamber shall
elect one (1) member from their chamber to serve as co-chair. The co-chairs shall
have joint responsibilities for subcommittee meeting agendas and presiding at
subcommittee meetings. A majority of the entire membership of the Education
Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee shall constitute a quorum,
and all actions of the subcommittee shall be by vote of a majority of its entire
Page 24 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
membership. Any vacancy that may occur in the membership of the subcommittee
shall be filled by the same appointing authority who made the original appointment.
(2) The subcommittee shall review administrative regulations and advise the Kentucky
Board of Education concerning the implementation of the state system of
assessment and accountability, established in KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, and
158.782, and for any administrative regulation promulgated under provisions of
KRS 158.860.
(3) The subcommittee may temporarily authorize the Kentucky Department of
Education or Kentucky Board of Education to require a new report that is not
expressly required by state statute or federal law while the General Assembly is
not in session. The authorization shall expire upon the sine die adjournment of
the next regular session of the General Assembly.
(4) The subcommittee shall advise and monitor the Office of Education Accountability
in the performance of its duties according to the provisions of KRS 7.410.
(5)[(4)] On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the
monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both
co-chairs. The members of the subcommittee shall be compensated for attending
meetings as provided in KRS 7.090.
(6)[(5)] Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee
shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090.
Section 5. KRS 158.647 (Effective January 1, 2027) is amended to read as
follows:
(1) A permanent subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission to be known
as the Education Assessment and Accountability Review Subcommittee is hereby
created. The subcommittee shall be composed of eight (8) members appointed as
follows: three (3) members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate;
one (1) member of the minority party in the Senate appointed by the Minority Floor
Page 25 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
Leader in the Senate; three (3) members of the House of Representatives appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and one (1) member of the
minority party in the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Floor
Leader in the House of Representatives. Members of the subcommittee shall be
appointed in January of each odd-numbered year and shall serve for terms of two
(2) years. The President of the Senate and Speaker of the House of Representatives
shall each appoint one (1) member of the subcommittee from their chamber to serve
as co-chair. The co-chairs shall have joint responsibilities for subcommittee
meeting agendas and presiding at subcommittee meetings. A majority of the entire
membership of the Education Assessment and Accountability Review
Subcommittee shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the subcommittee shall
be by vote of a majority of its entire membership. Any vacancy that may occur in
the membership of the subcommittee shall be filled within thirty (30) days of the
occurrence, in the same manner as the original appointment, and for the balance of
the vacated member's term.
(2) The subcommittee shall review administrative regulations and advise the Kentucky
Board of Education concerning the implementation of the state system of
assessment and accountability, established in KRS 158.6453, 158.6455, and
158.782, and for any administrative regulation promulgated under provisions of
KRS 158.860.
(3) The subcommittee may temporarily authorize the Kentucky Department of
Education or Kentucky Board of Education to require a new report that is not
expressly required by state statute or federal law while the General Assembly is
not in session. The temporary authorization shall expire upon the sine die
adjournment of the next regular session of the General Assembly.
(4) The subcommittee shall advise and monitor the Office of Education Accountability
in the performance of its duties according to the provisions of KRS 7.410.
Page 26 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
(5)[(4)] On an alternating basis, each co-chair shall have the first option to set the
monthly meeting date. A monthly meeting may be canceled by agreement of both
co-chairs. The members of the subcommittee shall be compensated for attending
meetings as provided in KRS 7.090.
(6)[(5)] Any professional, clerical, or other employees required by the subcommittee
shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of KRS 7.090.
Section 6. The following KRS section is repealed:
158.867 Minimum requirements for summer learning camps at schools with certain
Title I programs -- Mandatory reports -- Student participation guidelines -- Teacher
compensation -- Summary annual reports.
Section 7. (1) Notwithstanding 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 145, sec. 13(3), the
Kentucky Department of Education and Kentucky Board of Education may require the
following reports, regardless of whether the report is expressly required by state statute or
federal law:
(a) Any new or existing report required to administer federal programs or
required to respond to specific requests or requirements from the United States
Department of Education or other federal government entity, including but not limited to:
1. 21st Century Community Learning Center reports;
2. Perkins Comprehensive Local Needs Assessment; and
3. "CDIP" quarterly expenditure reports;
(b) Any existing report required to administer state funding;
(c) Any new or existing report required to administer federal funding;
(d) Any existing report required to monitor compliance with state statute;
(e) Any new or existing report required to monitor compliance with federal law;
(f) Any report temporarily authorized by the Education Assessment and
Accountability Review Subcommittee pursuant to Section 4 or 5 of this Act;
(g) Any existing report related to pupil transportation, including but not limited
Page 27 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
to:
1. School bus inventory;
2. Transportation growth factor adjustment form;
3. Certification of school bus transportation milage;
4. School bus driver database;
5. Pupil transportation adjustment end-of-year form; and
6. School bus accidents;
(h) The superintendent compensation survey;
(i) Professional staff data report;
(j) Classified staff data report;
(k) Growth factor report;
(l) Superintendent's annual attendance report;
(m) QA homeless report;
(n) Alternative education program reports;
(o) New and amended school calendars;
(p) Home/hospital reporting; and
(q) Property acquisition and disposal.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the Kentucky Department
of Education shall cease requiring the following reports:
(a) Any component of a comprehensive school improvement plan that does not
expressly apply to a specific school under federal law or state statute, regardless of
whether the component is required by a state administrative regulation; and
(b) Any component of a comprehensive district improvement plan that does not
expressly apply to a specific school district under federal law or state statute, regardless
of whether the component is required by a state administrative regulation.
Section 8. The components of 703 KAR 5:225 that impose a reporting
requirement on any school or school district that are not expressly required by federal law
Page 28 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 654/GA
or state statute shall be null and void.
Section 9. Whereas school districts need relief from unnecessary reporting
requirements upon starting the 2026-2027 school year, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 29 of 29
HB065410.100 - 1336 - XXXX 3/11/2026 2:49 PM GA